Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8219
Hospital, defined.

Hospital means a health care facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act or a comparable health care facility operated by the federal government or located and licensed in another state.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 19;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 146.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.